Hawaii statutes.
§612-2 Prohibition of discrimination.
A citizen shall not be excluded from jury service in this State on account of
race, color, religion, sex, national origin, economic status, or physical
disability, except as provided in section 612-4(b)(1). [L 1973, c 191, pt of
§1; am L 1976, c 159, §9; am L 2007, c 122, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next